Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.090

Actions for recovery of property and on contract.

Actions for the recovery of any property or for the possession thereof, and all actions founded upon contracts, may be maintained by and against personal representatives in all cases in which the same might have been maintained by and against their respective testators or intestates.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.48.090. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 148; RRS s 1518; prior: Code 1881 s 1529; 1860 p 206 s 222; 1854 p 291 s 142.]

NOTES:

Performance of decedent's contracts: Chapter 11.60 RCW.

Survival of actions: Chapter 4.20 RCW.